Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2306
State funds; depositories; security in lieu of bonds.

In lieu of a bond as provided in section 77-2305, any bank making application to become a depository under the provisions of sections 77-2301 to 77-2309 may give security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act to the State Treasurer.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 3, p. 348;

Laws 1897, c. 23, § 2, p. 188;

Laws 1899, c. 74, § 1, p. 321;

Laws 1905, c. 151, § 1, p. 595;

Laws 1907, c. 142, § 1, p. 450;

Laws 1909, c. 139, § 1, p. 493;

R.S.1913, § 6657;

C.S.1922, § 6188;

Laws 1927, c. 34, § 1, p. 153;

C.S.1929, § 77-2503;

Laws 1931, c. 135, § 1, p. 276;

Laws 1933, c. 147, § 1, p. 564;

Laws 1935, c. 152, § 2, p. 560;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2503;

R.S.1943, § 77-2306;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 13, p. 944;

Laws 1967, c. 507, § 1, p. 1707;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 27.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.